Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5266.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 28-9.3-7 of the General Laws in Chapter 28-9.3 entitled "Certified
School Teachers’ Arbitration" is hereby amended to read as follows:
28-9.3-7. Certification of negotiating agent.
(a) No association or organization shall be initially certified as the representative of
certified public school teachers except after an election.
(b) Teachers shall be free to join or to decline to join any association or organization
regardless of whether it has been certified as the exclusive representative of certified public school
teachers.
(c) If new elections are not held after an association or labor organization is certified, the
association or organization shall continue as the exclusive representative of the certified public
school teachers from year to year until recognition is withdrawn or changed as provided in § 28-
9.3-5.
(d) Elections shall not be held more often than once each twelve (12) months and must be
held at least thirty (30) days before the expiration date of any employment contract.
(e) Any employees in the bargaining unit, who are not members of the exclusive bargaining
representative organization, may be required by the labor or employee organization to pay a
reasonable charge for representation in grievances and/or arbitrations brought at the nonmember’s
request.

(f) The employer shall notify the exclusive bargaining unit representative organization of
the hiring of any employee in the bargaining unit. The notice shall be given promptly after the
hiring decision is made but in no event later than the fifth business day following the employee’s
start date.
(g) Bargaining unit lists:
(1) Once every one hundred twenty (120) days, or on a more frequent basis if mutually
agreed to by the employer and the employee organization, the employer shall provide the employee
organization that is the exclusive representative of a bargaining unit, and any statewide employee
organization, of which the local employee organization is an affiliate, with a list of all employees
in that bargaining unit.
(2) The list shall include, as appropriate, each employee's employee ID number, first name,
last name, work location/department, job title/classification, date of hire, date of birth, demographic
information, contact information, and whether the employee has, to the employer's records,
authorized dues deduction. As used in this section, "demographic information", includes the
employee's sex and race/ethnicity, to the extent the employer is in possession of such information.
As used in this section, "contact information" includes an employee's home address, mailing
address, work email address, personal email address, and home and personal cellular telephone
numbers, to the extent that the employer is in possession of such information.
(3) To the extent possible, the employee list shall be in alphabetical order by last name and
provided as an electronic spreadsheet with one column for each of the data listed in subsection
(g)(2) of this section.
(4) The list shall be kept confidential by the employer and the employee organization and
shall be exempt from copying and inspection under chapter 2 of title 38 ("access to public records").
SECTION 2. Section 28-9.4-8 of the General Laws in Chapter 28-9.4 entitled "Municipal
Employees’ Arbitration" is hereby amended to read as follows:
28-9.4-8. Certification of negotiating agent.
(a) No employee organization shall be initially certified as the representative of municipal
employees in an appropriate bargaining unit except after an election.
(b) Municipal employees shall be free to join or decline to join any employee organization
regardless of whether it has been certified as the exclusive representative of municipal employees
in an appropriate bargaining unit.
(c) If new elections are not held after an employee organization is certified, the employee
organization shall continue as the exclusive representative of the municipal employees of the
appropriate bargaining unit from year to year until recognition is withdrawn or changed as provided
LC001066 - Page 2 of 6

in § 28-9.4-6.
(d) Elections shall not be held more often than once each twelve (12) months and must be
held at least thirty (30) days before the expiration date of any employment contract.
(e) An employee organization designated as the representative of the majority of the
municipal employees in an appropriate bargaining unit shall be the exclusive bargaining agent for
all municipal employees of the unit, and shall act, negotiate agreements, and bargain collectively
for all employees in the unit and shall be responsible for representing the interest of all the
municipal employees without discrimination and without regard to employee organization
membership.
(f) Any employee(s) in the bargaining unit, who are not members of the exclusive
bargaining representative organization, may be required by the labor or employee organization to
pay a reasonable charge for representation in grievances and/or arbitrations brought at the
nonmember’s request.
(g) The employer shall notify the exclusive bargaining unit representative organization of
the hiring of any employee in the bargaining unit. The notice shall be given promptly after the
hiring decision is made but in no event later than the fifth business day following the employee’s
start date.
(h) Bargaining unit lists:
(1) Once every one hundred twenty (120) days, or on a more frequent basis if mutually
agreed to by the employer and the employee organization, the employer shall provide the employee
organization that is the exclusive representative of a bargaining unit, and any statewide employee
organization, of which the local employee organization is an affiliate, with a list of all employees
in that bargaining unit.
(2) The list shall include, as appropriate, each employee's employee ID number, first name,
last name, work location/department, job title/classification, date of hire, date of birth, demographic
information, contact information, and whether the employee has, to the employer's records,
authorized dues deduction. As used in this section, "demographic information" includes the
employee's sex and race/ethnicity, to the extent the employer is in possession of such information.
As used in this section, "contact information" includes an employee's home address, mailing
address, work email address, personal email address, and home and personal cellular telephone
numbers, to the extent that the employer is in possession of such information.
(3) To the extent possible, the employee list shall be in alphabetical order by last name and
provided as an electronic spreadsheet with one column for each of the data listed in subsection
(h)(2) of this section.
LC001066 - Page 3 of 6

(4) The list shall be kept confidential by the employer and the employee organization and
shall be exempt from copying and inspection under chapter 2 of title 38 ("access to public records").
SECTION 3. Section 36-11-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 36-11 entitled "Organization
of State Employees" is hereby amended to read as follows:
36-11-2. Discrimination because of membership in employee organization prohibited.
(a) There shall be no discrimination against any state employee because the employee has
formed, joined, or chosen to be represented by any labor or employee organization.
(b) Supervisory employees shall not endorse any particular labor or employee organization
or by reason of membership in any organization, show prejudice or discriminate against any
individual employee.
(c) Membership in any labor or employee organization may be determined by each
individual employee and each individual member. Membership dues or fees are established in
amounts as determined by the organization.
(d) The state controller shall hereby be directed, upon certification of the exclusive
bargaining organization, to deduct biweekly membership dues from the employee’s salary and
remit the amount to the treasurer of the exclusive bargaining organization.
(e) Any employees in the bargaining unit, who are not members of the exclusive bargaining
representative organization, may be required by the labor or employee organization to pay a
reasonable charge for grievances and/or arbitrations brought at the nonmember’s request.
(f) The employer shall notify the exclusive bargaining unit representative organization of
the hiring of any employee in the bargaining unit. The notice shall be given promptly after the
hiring decision is made but in no event later than the fifth business day following the employee’s
start date.
(g) Bargaining unit lists:
(1) Once every one hundred twenty (120) days, or on a more frequent basis if mutually
agreed to by the employer and the employee organization, the employer shall provide the employee
organization that is the exclusive representative of a bargaining unit, and any statewide employee
organization, of which the local employee organization is an affiliate, with a list of all employees
in that bargaining unit.
(2) The list shall include, as appropriate, each employee's employee ID number, first name,
last name, work location/department, job title/classification, date of hire, date of birth, demographic
information, contact information, and whether the employee has, to the employer's records,
authorized dues deduction. As used in this section, "demographic information" includes the
employee's sex and race/ethnicity, to the extent the employer is in possession of such information.
LC001066 - Page 4 of 6

As used in this section, "contact information" includes an employee's home address, mailing
address, work email address, personal email address, and home and personal cellular telephone
numbers, to the extent that the employer is in possession of such information.
(3) To the extent possible, the employee list shall be in alphabetical order by last name and
provided as an electronic spreadsheet with one column for each of the data listed in subsection
(g)(2) of this section.
(4) The list shall be kept confidential by the employer and the employee organization and
shall be exempt from copying and inspection under chapter 2 of title 38 ("access to public records").
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001066
========
LC001066 - Page 5 of 6